Maine, session 132, LD558.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA §1308, sub-§3-A is enacted to read:
3-A. Debt buyer. "Debt buyer" has the same meaning as in Title 32, section 11002,
subsection 5-A.
Sec. 2. 10 MRSA §1308, sub-§3-B is enacted to read:
3-B. Debt collector. "Debt collector" has the same meaning as in Title 32, section
11002, subsection 6.
Sec. 3. 10 MRSA §1308, sub-§4-A is enacted to read:
4-A. Medical creditor. "Medical creditor" means an entity that provides health care
services and to whom a consumer incurs medical debt or an entity that provided health care
services to a consumer and to whom the consumer previously owed medical debt if the
medical debt has been purchased by one or more debt buyers.
Sec. 4. 10 MRSA §1308, sub-§4-B is enacted to read:
4-B. Medical debt. "Medical debt" has the same meaning as in Title 32, section
11002, subsection 7-A.
Sec. 5. 10 MRSA §1310-H, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 77, §2, is amended
to read:
4. Reporting of medical expenses debt on a consumer report. Notwithstanding any
provision of federal law, a consumer reporting agency shall comply with the following
provisions with respect to the reporting of medical expenses debt on a consumer report.
A. A consumer reporting agency may not report debt from medical expenses medical
debt on a consumer's consumer report when the date of the first delinquency on the
debt is less than 180 days prior to the date that the debt is reported and a medical
creditor, debt collector or debt buyer may not report a consumer's medical debt to a
consumer reporting agency.
Page 1 - 132LR0718(03)

B. Upon the receipt of reasonable evidence from the consumer, creditor or debt
collector that a debt from medical expenses has been settled in full or paid in full, a
consumer reporting agency:
(1) May not report that debt from medical expenses; and
(2) Shall remove or suppress the report of that debt from medical expenses on the
consumer's consumer report.
C. As long as the consumer is making regular, scheduled periodic payments toward
the debt from medical expenses reported to the consumer reporting agency as agreed
upon by the consumer and medical provider, the consumer reporting agency shall
report that debt from medical expenses on the consumer's consumer report in the same
manner as debt related to a consumer credit transaction is reported.
Page 2 - 132LR0718(03)